Hawaii statutes.
[§708-837] Failure to return a rental motor
vehicle; penalty. [(1)] A person commits the offense of failure to return
a rental motor vehicle when he intentionally does not return the motor vehicle
to the person, or his agent, from whom the vehicle was rented within
forty-eight hours after the time stated on the rental agreement, unless the
person renting the vehicle gives notice that he will not be able to return the
vehicle in the stated time and extends the time in which the vehicle will be
returned.

[(2)] Failure to return a rental motor vehicle
is a misdemeanor. [L 1973, c 63, §1]

COMMENTARY ON §708-837

This section was added by Act 63, Session Laws 1973, "to
provide an incentive to a person who rents a motor vehicle to return it to its
lawful owner." House Standing Committee Report No. 821.

The Committee Report further states that "rental
agencies have been plagued for a number of years with overdue and abandoned
vehicles. Presently, there is no legal means available to compel a person to return
the vehicle when it is overdue. This proposed bill would make it a misdemeanor
if a person intentionally fails to return a rental motor vehicle."

Case Notes

Where police stopped defendant's rental car after they had
received a report from the car's owner that the car was overdue, police had
reasonable suspicion to stop the car, even if the report turned out to be
mistaken due to its timing, because the police were acting on a police report
from the car's owner, whose honesty had not been questioned. 241 F.3d 1124
(2001).

Mentioned: 86 H. 207, 948 P.2d 1048 (1997).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next